District of Columbia statutes.
24-531.12

Independent experts.

At any time from the initial court appearance through the conclusion of the transfer proceeding or the criminal case, the Court may, upon request, authorize either the prosecutor or defense attorney, or both, to engage one or more independent experts to examine the defendant for competence and any related issues.

May 24, 2005, D.C. Law 15-358, § 112, 52 DCR 2015